Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 1. Definitions and General Provisions.
§ 4.1-119.
(Effective July 1, 2024) Operation of government stores.

Subject to the provisions of §§

4.1-121

and

4.1-122

, the Board may establish, maintain, and operate government stores for the sale of spirits, nonalcoholic spirit alternatives, wine produced by farm wineries, low alcohol beverage coolers produced by licensed distillers, vermouth, mixers, products used in connection with distilled spirits, including any garnish or garnishment applied to the rim of a glass of distilled spirits, as may be approved by the Board from time to time, and products licensed by the Virginia Tourism Corporation as specified in §

4.1-103

in such counties, cities, and towns considered advisable by the Board. The Board may discontinue any such store.

With respect to the sale of wine or cider produced by farm wineries, the Board may give preference to farm wineries that produce 2,500 cases or less of wine or cider per year.

The Board shall fix the wholesale and retail prices at which the various classes, varieties and brands of alcoholic beverages and other Board-approved products that are sold in government stores. Differences in the cost of operating stores, and market competition and conditions may be reflected in the sale price of alcoholic beverages sold at government stores. The Board may sell alcoholic beverages to federal instrumentalities (i) authorized and operating under the laws of the United States and regulations of the United States Department of Defense and (ii) located within the boundaries of federal enclaves or reservations over which the United States has acquired jurisdiction, at prices which may be greater or less than the wholesale price charged other authorized purchasers. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of the Board to fix the retail price of alcoholic beverages sold at government stores, which retail price may include promotional, volume, or other discounts deemed appropriate by the Board.

Alcoholic beverages at government stores shall be sold by employees of the Authority who shall carry out the provisions of this subtitle and Board regulations governing the operation of government stores and the sale of alcoholic beverages, except that the Board may appoint the holder of a distiller’s license or its officers and employees as agents of the Board for the sale of spirits and low alcohol beverage coolers, manufactured by or for, or blended by such licensee on the licensed premises, at government stores established by the Board (i) on the distiller’s licensed premises or (ii) at the site of an event licensed by the Board and conducted for the purpose of featuring and educating the consuming public about spirits products.

Such agents shall sell the spirits and low alcohol beverage coolers in accordance with the provisions of this subtitle, Board regulations, and the terms of the agency agreement between the Authority and the licensed distiller. The Authority shall pay a licensed distiller making sales pursuant to an agreement authorized by this subsection a commission of not less than 20 percent of the retail price of the goods sold. If the licensed distiller makes application and meets certain requirements established by the Board, such agreement shall allow monthly revenue transfers from the licensed distiller to the Board to be submitted electronically and, notwithstanding the provisions of §§

2.2-1802

and

4.1-116

, to be limited to the amount due to the Board in applicable taxes and markups.

For the purposes of this subsection, “blended” means the receipt by a licensed distiller of deliveries and shipments of alcoholic beverages, other than wine and beer, in accordance with subdivision A 6 of §

4.1-201

to be (a)(1) additionally aged by the receiving distillery in order to increase the quality and flavor of such alcoholic beverages or (2) used in a low alcohol beverage cooler and (b) bottled by the receiving distillery.

No Class 1 neutral grain spirit or alcohol, as defined by federal regulations, that is without distinctive character, aroma, taste or color shall be sold in government stores at a proof greater than 151 except upon permits issued by the Board for industrial, commercial, culinary, or medical use.

All alcoholic beverages sold in government stores, except for tasting samples pursuant to subsection G sold in government stores established by the Board on a distiller’s licensed premises, shall be in closed containers, sealed and affixed with labels prescribed by the Board.

No alcoholic beverages shall be consumed in a government store by any person unless it is part of an organized tasting event conducted by (i) an employee of a manufacturer of distilled spirits or farm winery or (ii) an authorized representative of a manufacturer of distilled spirits or farm winery with a permit issued by the Board pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

4.1-212

, at which the samples of alcoholic beverages provided to any consumer do not exceed the limits for spirits or wine set forth in subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201.1

. No sample may be consumed by any individual to whom alcoholic beverages may not lawfully be sold pursuant to §

4.1-304

.

Notwithstanding the provision of this subsection to the contrary, an agent of the Board appointed pursuant to subsection D may give samples of spirits, beer, wine, or cider to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for on-premises or off-premises consumption, provided that (i) the spirits, beer, wine, or cider samples are manufactured within the same licensed premises or on contiguous premises of such agent licensed as a distillery, brewery, or winery; (ii) no single sample shall exceed four ounces of beer, two ounces of wine or cider, or one-half ounce of spirits, unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a single sample of spirits may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits; (iii) no more than 12 ounces of beer, five ounces of wine, or three ounces of spirits shall be given or sold to any person per day; and (iv) in the case of spirits samples, a method is used to track the consumption of each consumer. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit such agent from serving samples of spirits as part of a mixed beverage. Such mixed beverage samples may contain spirits or vermouth not manufactured on the licensed premises or on contiguous premises of the licensed distillery, provided that at least 75 percent of the alcohol used in such samples is manufactured on the licensed premises or on contiguous premises of the licensed distillery. An agent of the Board appointed pursuant to subsection D may keep on the licensed premises no more than 10 varieties of spirits or vermouth not manufactured on the licensed premises or on contiguous premises of the licensed distillery. Any spirits or vermouth used in such samples that are not manufactured on the licensed premises or on contiguous premises of the licensed distillery shall be purchased from the Board.

Any case fee charged to a licensed distiller by the Board for moving spirits from the production and bailment area to the tasting area of a government store established by the Board on the distiller’s licensed premises shall be waived if such spirits are moved by employees of the licensed distiller.

The Board shall establish guidelines governing tasting events conducted pursuant to this subsection.

With respect to purchases by licensees at government stores, the Authority shall (i) accept in payment for any purchase or series of purchases cash, electronic fund transfer, credit or debit card, or check payable to the Authority, in the exact amount of any such purchase or series of purchases and (ii) provide notice to licensees on Board policies relating to the assignment of government stores from which licensees may purchase products and any procedure for the licensee to elect to make purchases from an alternative government store.

With respect to purchases by consumers at government stores, the Authority shall accept cash in payment for any purchase or series of purchases. The Board may adopt regulations which provide for accepting a credit card or debit card as payment. Such regulations may provide for the collection, where appropriate, of related fees, penalties, and service charges for the use of a credit card or debit card by any consumer.

Before the Authority implements any increase in the markup on distilled spirits or any change to the markup formula for distilled spirits pursuant to §

4.1-235

that would result in an increase in the retail price of distilled spirits sold to the public, the Authority shall (i) provide at least 45 days’ public notice before such a price increase takes effect; (ii) provide the opportunity for submission of written comments regarding the proposed price increase; (iii) conduct a public meeting for the purpose of receiving verbal comment regarding the proposed price increase; and (iv) consider any written or verbal comments before implementing such a price increase.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-15; 1958, c. 269; 1962, c. 453; 1970, c. 351; 1983, c. 267; 1984, c. 200; 1992, c. 782; 1993, cc. 252, 866; 1996, c. 558; 1999, c. 98; 2005, c. 651; 2006, c. 106; 2007, cc. 546, 726, 820; 2008, c. 609; 2009, c. 620; 2010, cc. 115, 170, 517; 2011, c. 713; 2012, c. 344; 2013, c. 476; 2014, cc. 437, 724; 2015, cc. 38, 62, 604, 730; 2016, cc. 21, 132, 141; 2017, cc. 75, 125, 155, 160; 2018, c. 734; 2019, cc. 37, 178, 466, 810, 811, 814; 2020, cc. 1017, 1113, 1114; .

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2024. For the version of this section effective until July 1, 2024, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

4.1-119

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 194 inserted “nonalcoholic spirit alternatives” in subsection A; and made a stylistic change.

§ 4.1-119.1.
Human trafficking hotline; posted notice required.

Within each government store, except for government stores established on a distiller’s licensed premises pursuant to subsection D of §

4.1-119

, the Authority shall post notice of the existence of a human trafficking hotline to alert possible witnesses or victims of human trafficking to the availability of a means to report crimes or gain assistance. The notice required by this section shall (i) be posted in a place readily visible and accessible to the public and (ii) meet the requirements specified in subsection C of §

40.1-11.3

.

History.

2019, c. 388.

§ 4.1-120.
When government stores closed.

Except as provided in subsection B, no sale or delivery of alcoholic beverages shall be made at any government store, nor shall any such store be kept open for the sale of alcoholic beverages:

On Sunday;

On Thanksgiving Day, Christmas Day and New Year’s Day; or

During such other periods and on such other days as the Board may direct.

Certain government stores, as determined by the Board, may be open on Sunday for the sale of alcoholic beverages after 10:00 a.m.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-19; 1972, c. 138; 1992, c. 129; 1993, c. 866; 2004, c. 1002; 2008, c. 134; 2012, c. 245; 2019, cc. 810, 811.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 395 D, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

4.1-120

, Code of Virginia, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board may open certain government stores, as determined by the Board, for the sale of alcoholic beverages on New Year’s Day and on Sundays after 10:00 a.m.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1002 added the subsection A designation; added “Except as provided in subsection B” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 134 substituted “a population of 100,000 or more” for “a population in excess of 200,000” in subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 245 deleted “in any county having the urban county executive form of government, in any city adjacent to or completely surrounded by any such county, in any county contiguous to any such county, in any city adjacent to or completely surrounded by any such contiguous county, or in any city having a population of 100,000 or more” following “as determined by the Board” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 810 and 811 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “10:00 a.m.” for “1:00 p.m.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

§ 4.1-121.
Referendum on establishment of government stores.

The qualified voters of any county, city, or town having a population of 1,000 or more may file a petition with the circuit court of the county or city, or of the county wherein the town or the greater part thereof is situated, asking that a referendum be held on the question of whether the sale by the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority of alcoholic beverages, other than beer and wine not produced by farm wineries, should be prohibited within that jurisdiction. The petition shall be signed by qualified voters equal in number to at least 10 percent of the number registered in the jurisdiction on January 1 preceding its filing or by at least 100 qualified voters, whichever is greater. Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall order the election officials of the county, city, or town, on the date fixed in the order, to conduct a referendum on the question. The clerk of the circuit court shall publish notice of the referendum in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or town once a week for three consecutive weeks prior to the referendum.The question on the ballot shall be:“Shall the sale by the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority of alcoholic beverages, other than beer and wine not produced by farm wineries, be prohibited in ................ (name of county, city, or town)?”The referendum shall be ordered and held and the results certified as provided in §

24.2-684

. Thereupon the court shall enter of record an order certified by the clerk of the court to be transmitted to the Board and to the governing body of the county, city, or town.

Once a referendum has been held, no other referendum on the same question shall be held in the county, city, or town within four years of the date of the prior referendum. However, a town shall not be prescribed from holding a referendum within such period although an election has been held in the county in which the town or a part thereof is located less than four years prior thereto.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-45; 1954, c. 221; 1974, c. 399; 1975, c. 517; 1977, c. 683; 1980, cc. 541, 543; 1984, c. 200; 1993, c. 866; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2019, cc. 37, 178.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2019, cc. 37 and 178, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and third enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts 2019, cc. 37 and 178, cl. 5 provides: “That a referendum may be held in any town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county between July 1, 2019, and June 30, 2020, on either or both of the following questions: “Shall the sale of mixed alcoholic beverages by restaurants licensed by the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority be prohibited in ................ (name of town, county, or supervisor’s election district of county)?” and “Shall the sale by the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority of alcoholic beverages, other than beer and wine not produced by farm wineries, be prohibited in ................ (name of county, city, or town)?” The result of any referendum held pursuant to this enactment shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts 2019, cc. 37 and 178, cl. 6 provides: “That the result of any referendum held by a town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county prior to July 1, 2019, under the provisions of §

4.1-121

or

4.1-124

of the Code of Virginia, as those sections were in effect prior to the effective date of the first enactment, shall remain valid and enforceable for a period of five years after the date upon which such referendum was held.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Board of Alcoholic Beverages” and “10” for “ten” in subsection A and in the ballot question substituted substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 37 and 178 are identical, effective July 1, 2020, and in subsection A, inserted “of alcoholic beverages” and substituted “prohibited” for “permitted” in the first sentence, and substituted “prohibited” for “permitted” in the ballot question.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, § 32.

§ 4.1-122.
Effect of local option referenda.

If in any referendum held under the provisions of §

4.1-121

in any county, city, or town a majority of the qualified voters vote “Yes” on the question, then on and after 60 days from the date on which the order of the court, setting forth the results of such referendum was entered of record, none of the alcoholic beverages voted against shall be sold in such county, city, or town except for delivery or shipment to persons outside of such county, city, or town authorized under this subtitle to acquire the alcoholic beverages for resale. This subsection shall not apply to common carriers of passengers by train, boat or airplane selling wine and beer to bona fide passengers.

If in any such referendum held in any county, city, or town in which a majority of the qualified voters have previously voted to prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages by the Board and in a subsequent election a majority of the voters of the county, city, or town vote “No” on the question stated in §

4.1-121

, then such alcoholic beverages may, in accordance with this subtitle, be sold within the county, city, or town on and after 60 days from the day on which the order of the court setting forth the results of such election is entered of record.

If any referendum is held under the provisions of §

4.1-124

in any county, town, or supervisor’s election district of a county and the majority of voters voting in such referendum voted “Yes,” the sale by the Board of alcoholic beverages, other than beer and wine not produced by farm wineries, shall be prohibited in such county, town, or supervisor’s election district of a county. Notwithstanding this section and any referendum held under §

4.1-121

to the contrary, persons licensed to sell mixed beverages in such county, town, or supervisor’s election district of a county shall also be permitted to sell wine and beer for on-premises consumption, provided the appropriate license fees are paid for the privilege.

The provisions of this section shall not prevent in any county, city, or town, the sale and delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages specified in §

4.1-200

to and by persons therein authorized to sell alcoholic beverages, nor prevent the delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages under Board regulations into any county, city, or town, except as otherwise prohibited by this subtitle.

For the purpose of this section, when any referendum is held in any town, separate and apart from the county in which such town or a part thereof is located, such town shall be treated as being separate and apart from such county.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-46; 1954, c. 221; 1974, c. 460; 1975, c. 482; 1977, c. 683; 1980, cc. 541, 543; 1982, cc. 66, 204; 1984, c. 200; 1991, c. 690; 1993, c. 866; 2019, cc. 37, 178.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 37 and 178, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and third enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 37 and 178 are identical, effective July 1, 2020, and in subsection A, substituted “ ‘Yes’ ” for “ ‘No’ ”’ in the first sentence; in subsection B, substituted “to prohibit” for “against permitting,” substituted “ ‘No’ ” for “ ‘Yes’,” and deleted “permitted to be sold by such referendum” following “such alcoholic beverages”; in subsection C, substituted “prohibited” for “permitted” in the first sentence; and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, § 32.

§ 4.1-123.
Referendum on Sunday wine and beer sales; exception.

Either the qualified voters or the governing body of any county, city, town, or supervisor’s election district of a county may file a petition with the circuit court of the county or city or of the county wherein the town or the greater part thereof is situated asking that a referendum be held on the question of whether the sale of beer and wine on Sunday should be permitted within that jurisdiction. The petition of voters shall be signed by qualified voters equal in number to at least ten percent of the number registered in the jurisdiction on January 1 preceding its filing or at least 100 qualified voters, whichever is greater. Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall order the election officials of the county, city, or town, on the date fixed in the order, to conduct a referendum on the question. The clerk of the circuit court shall publish notice of the referendum in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or town once a week for three consecutive weeks prior to the referendum.The question on the ballot shall be:“Shall the sale of wine and beer between the hours of twelve o’clock p.m. on each Saturday and six o’clock a.m. on each Monday be permitted in _______________ (name of county, city, town, or supervisor’s election district of the county)?”The referendum shall be ordered and held and the results certified as provided in §

24.2-684

. Thereupon the court shall enter of record an order certified by the clerk of the court to be transmitted to the Board and to the governing body of the county, city, or town.Notwithstanding an ordinance adopted pursuant to §

4.1-129

, an affirmative majority vote on the question shall be binding on the governing body of the county, city, or town, and the governing body shall take all actions required of it to legalize such Sunday sales.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A or §

4.1-129

, where property that constitutes a farm winery lies within, or abuts, the boundaries of Floyd and Patrick Counties, the retail sale of wine by the farm winery licensee in the county that restricts the sale of wine and beer shall be allowed at one fixed location on a parcel of land that contains all or part of the licensee’s producing vineyard and the licensee’s vinification facilities.The Board may refuse to allow such licensee the exercise of his retail sales privilege in the county restricting the Sunday sale of wine and beer if the Board determines, after giving the licensee notice and a hearing, that (i) the owner of the farm winery had actual knowledge that the vinification facilities and all or part of the producing vineyard were going to be located in the county restricting the sale of wine and beer prior to construction of the vinification facilities or (ii) the primary business purpose of the farm winery licensee is to engage in the retail sale of wine in such county rather than the business of a farm winery.Nothing in this subsection shall apply to a farm winery licensee that has a retail establishment for the sale of its wine in the county adjoining the county that restricts the Sunday sale of wine and beer if the retail establishment is within one-half mile of the farm winery’s vinification facilities.

History.

1979, c. 621, § 4-96.3; 1980, c. 543; 1993, c. 866; 2001, cc. 594, 783; 2007, c. 813.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 594 added the subsection A designator to the first paragraph, and added subsection B.

The 2001 amendment by c. 783 deleted “or” preceding “town” and inserted “or supervisor’s election district of a county” following “town” in the first paragraph of present subsection A, and deleted “or” preceding “town” and inserted “or supervisor’s election district of the county” following “town” in the ballot question in subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Floyd and Patrick Counties” for “two adjoining counties, one of which has a population between 12,000 and 12,100 and one of which has a population between 17,450 and 17,500” in subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Qualified voters.” —

Based on the plain language of subsection A of §

4.1-124

, neither a member of the Board of Supervisors nor the Board of Supervisors in its entirety is authorized to petition the circuit court for a referendum on mixed beverage sales. See opinion of Attorney General to J. Vaden Hunt, Esquire, Pittsylvania County Attorney, 11-069, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 52 (7/1/11).

§ 4.1-124.
Referendum on the sale of mixed beverages.

The provisions of this subtitle relating to the sale of mixed beverages shall be effective in any town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county unless a majority of the voters voting in a referendum vote “Yes” on the question of whether the sale of mixed alcoholic beverages by restaurants licensed under this subtitle should be prohibited. The qualified voters of a town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county may file a petition with the circuit court of the county asking that a referendum be held on the question of whether the sale of mixed beverages by restaurants licensed by the Board should be prohibited within that jurisdiction. The petition shall be signed by qualified voters equal in number to at least 10 percent of the number registered in the town, county, or supervisor’s election district on January 1 preceding its filing or at least 100 qualified voters, whichever is greater.Petition requirements for any county shall be based on the number of registered voters in the county, including the number of registered voters in any town having a population in excess of 1,000 located within such county. Upon the filing of a petition, and under no other circumstances, the court shall order the election officials of the county to conduct a referendum on the question.The clerk of the circuit court of the county shall publish notice of the referendum in a newspaper of general circulation in the town, county, or supervisor’s election district once a week for three consecutive weeks prior to the referendum.The question on the ballot shall be:“Shall the sale of mixed alcoholic beverages by restaurants licensed by the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority be prohibited in _______________ (name of town, county, or supervisor’s election district of county)?”The referendum shall be ordered and held and the results certified as provided in Article 5 (§

24.2-681

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 24.2. Thereupon the court shall enter of record an order certified by the clerk of the court to be transmitted to the Board and to the governing body of the town or county. Mixed beverages prohibited from sale by such referendum shall not be sold by restaurants within the town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county on or after 30 days following the entry of the order if a majority of the voters voting in the referendum have voted “Yes.”The provisions of this section shall be applicable to towns having a population in excess of 1,000 to the same extent and subject to the same conditions and limitations as are otherwise applicable to counties under this section. Such towns shall be treated as separate local option units, and only residents of any such town shall be eligible to vote in any referendum held pursuant to this section for any such town. Residents of towns having a population in excess of 1,000, however, shall also be eligible to vote in any referendum held pursuant to this section for any county in which the town is located.Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the sale of mixed beverages by restaurants shall be prohibited in any town created as a result of a city-to-town reversion pursuant to Chapter 41 (§

15.2-4100

et seq.) of Title 15.2 if a referendum on the question of whether the sale of mixed beverages by restaurants licensed under this subtitle should be prohibited was previously held in the former city and a majority of the voters voting in such referendum voted “Yes.”

Once a referendum has been held, no other referendum on the same question shall be held in the town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county for a period of 23 months.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the sale of mixed beverages shall be allowed on property dedicated for industrial or commercial development and controlled through the provision of public utilities and covenanting of the land by any multijurisdictional industrial development authority, as set forth under Chapter 49 (§

15.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 15.2, provided that (i) such authority operates under a partnership agreement between three or more counties, cities, or towns and such jurisdictions participate administratively and financially in the authority and (ii) the sale of mixed beverages is permitted in one of the member counties, cities, towns, or a supervisor’s election district of one of the counties and that the governing board of the authority authorizes an establishment located within the confines of such property to apply to the Board for such license. The appropriate license fees shall be paid for this privilege.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this section and subsection C of §

4.1-122

, the sale of mixed beverages by licensees, and the sale of alcoholic beverages other than beer and wine not produced by farm wineries by the Board, shall be allowed in any city in the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Board may grant a mixed beverage restaurant license to a restaurant located on the premises of and operated by a private club exclusively for its members and their guests, subject to the qualifications and restrictions on the issuance of such license imposed by §

4.1-206.3

. However, no license authorized by this subsection shall be granted if the private club restricts its membership on the basis of race, color, creed, national origin, or sex.

History.

1968, c. 7, §§ 4-98.12, 4-98.13; 1975, c. 517; 1979, c. 199; 1982, c. 31; 1985, c. 551; 1986, c. 70; 1988, c. 156; 1991, c. 690; 1993, c. 866; 1995, c. 177; 1997, c. 126; 2011, c. 560; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2019, cc. 37, 178; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, cc. 38 and
730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts
2017, cc. 698 and
707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2019, cc. 37 and
178, cl. 3 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of
§

4.1-124

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, mixed beverage licenses may be granted to any establishment described in
§

4.1-126

of the Code of Virginia, as it was in effect prior to the effective date of this act, subject to all other applicable provisions of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and regulations of the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority.”

Acts
2019, cc. 37 and
178, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and third enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2019, cc. 37 and
178, cl. 5 provides: “That a referendum may be held in any town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county between July 1, 2019, and June 30, 2020, on either or both of the following questions: “Shall the sale of mixed alcoholic beverages by restaurants licensed by the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority be prohibited in
_______________
(name of town, county, or supervisor’s election district of county)?” and “Shall the sale by the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority of alcoholic beverages, other than beer and wine not produced by farm wineries, be prohibited in
_______________
(name of county, city, or town)?” The result of any referendum held pursuant to this enactment shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2019, cc. 37 and
178, cl. 6 provides: “That the result of any referendum held by a town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county prior to July 1, 2019, under the provisions of
§

4.1-121

or

4.1-124

of the Code of Virginia, as those sections were in effect prior to the effective date of the first enactment, shall remain valid and enforceable for a period of five years after the date upon which such referendum was held.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-210

” in subsection E at the end of the first sentence; and made a stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 560, in subsection A, in the second paragraph, substituted “including” for “exclusive of,” in the sixth paragraph, in the second sentence, inserted “only,” substituted “shall be eligible to vote” for “shall not be eligible to vote” and “for any such town” for “for any county in which the town is located,” added the last sentence, and deleted “However,” at the beginning of the last paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-210

” in subsection E at the end of the first sentence; and made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Alcoholic Beverage Control Board” in the ballot question in the fourth paragraph of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-210

” in subsection E at the end of the first sentence; and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 37 and 178 are identical, effective July 1, 2020, and in subsection A, substituted “shall be effective in any town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county unless a majority of the voters voting in a referendum vote ’Yes’ on the question of whether the sale of mixed alcoholic beverages restaurants licensed under this title should be prohibited” for “shall not become effective in any town, county, or supervisor’s election district of a county until a majority of the voters voting in a referendum vote affirmatively on the question of whether mixed alcoholic beverages should be sold by restaurants licensed under this title” in the first sentence and substituted “prohibited” for “permitted” in the second sentence, substituted “prohibited” for “permitted” within the ballot question in the fourth paragraph; in the fifth paragraph, substituted “prohibited from sale” for “permitted to be sold” and “shall not” for “may in accordance with this title” and deleted “licensed by the Board” following “sold by restaurants”; and rewrote the last paragraph, which read: “The provisions of this section shall not require any town created as a result of a city-to-town reversion pursuant to Chapter 41 (§

15.2-4100

et seq.) of Title 15.2 to hold a referendum on the same question if a majority of the voters voting in the former city had previously approved the sale of mixed beverages by restaurants licensed by the Board in such city.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-210

” in subsection E at the end of the first sentence; and made a stylistic change.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Only “qualified voters” may file petition. —

Based on the plain language of subsection A of §

4.1-124

, neither a member of the Board of Supervisors nor the Board of Supervisors in its entirety is authorized to petition the circuit court for a referendum on mixed beverage sales. See opinion of Attorney General to J. Vaden Hunt, Esquire, Pittsylvania County Attorney, 11-069, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 52 (7/1/11).

§ 4.1-125.
Section 4.1-124 applicable to certain towns.

The provisions of §

4.1-124

shall be applicable mutatis mutandis to any town within the Commonwealth which is entirely surrounded by a base of the United States armed forces.

History.

1968, c. 761, § 4-98.12:1; 1993, c. 866.